Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXXVIII.] HOME AND COMMUNITY-BASED CASE MANAGEMENT

AGENCIES
AND COMMUNITY CARE FOSTER FAMILY HOMES

Cross References

Inspections of state-licensed care facilities; public notice,
see §321-1.8.

[§321-481] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Certificate of approval" means the
certificate issued by the department or its designee that authorizes a person,
agency, or organization to operate a community care foster family home.

"Client" means any person who
receives home and community-based case management services to reside in a
community care foster family home, expanded adult residential care home, or
assisted living facility.

"Community care foster family home"
or "home" means a home that:

(1) Is regulated by the department in accordance with
rules that are equitable in relation to rules that govern expanded adult
residential care homes;

(2) Is issued a certificate of approval by the
department or its designee to provide, for a fee, twenty-four-hour living
accommodations, including personal care and homemaker services, for not more
than two adults at any one time, at least one of whom shall be a medicaid
recipient, who are at the nursing facility level of care, who are unrelated to
the foster family, and who are receiving the services of a licensed home and
community-based case management agency; provided that the department, in its
discretion, may certify a home for a third adult who is at the nursing level of
care and a medicaid recipient; provided further that the:

(A) Home has been certified and in operation
for not less than one year;

(B) Primary caregiver is a certified nurse
aide, as defined in section 457A‑1.5, who has completed a state-approved
training program and other training as required by the department; and

(C) Substitute caregiver is a nurse aide, as
defined in section 457A-1.5, who has completed a state-approved training
program and other training as required by the department; and

(3) Does not include expanded adult residential care
homes or assisted living facilities.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Designee" means a person,
institution, organization, or agency authorized by the department to issue
certificates of approval to community care foster family homes and to monitor
these homes for certificate compliance and quality assurance. The department's
designee shall perform these functions for the department and shall not, at the
same time, function as a home and community-based case management agency or a
community care foster family home as defined in this section.

"Home and community-based case management
agency" means any person, agency, or organization licensed by the
department to provide, coordinate, and monitor comprehensive services to meet
the needs of clients whom the agency serves in a community care foster family
home or any medicaid clients in an expanded adult residential care home, or an
assisted living facility.

"License" means an approval issued by
the department or its authorized agents for a person, agency, or organization
to operate as a home and community-based case management agency. [L 2012, c 93,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next